Idaho statutes. Title 53 PARTNERSHIP
Chapter 5
ASSUMED BUSINESS NAMES

Sec.

§ 53-501. Short title. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-801.

§ 53-502. Purpose. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-802.

§ 53-503. Definitions. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-803.

§ 53-504. Filing of certificate required. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-805.

§ 53-505. Contents of certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-806.

§ 53-506. Effect of filing — Duration

Continuation. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-807.

§ 53-507. Amendment of certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-808.

§ 53-508. Cancellation of certificate. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-809.

§ 53-509. Consequences of noncompliance. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-810.

§ 53-510. Fees. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 30-21-214.

§ 53-511. Dates of coverage

Transition. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 223, § 3, and S.L. 2015, ch. 251, § 3, effective July 1, 2015..